Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.230

Superintendent—Duties.

The superintendent shall be the chief executive officer of the hospital or institution and shall perform all administrative services necessary to the efficient and economical conduct of the hospital or institution and the admission and proper care of persons properly entitled to the services thereof as provided by law or by the rules and regulations of the board of trustees.

[ 1984 c 26 s 19; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.230. Prior: 1931 c 139 s 9; RRS s 6090-17.]